District of Columbia statutes.
1-817.03

Transfer of assets and obligations of Trust Fund and Federal Supplemental Fund.

(a)

Transfer of obligations. —

Effective October 1, 2004, all obligations to make Federal benefit payments shall be transferred from the Trust Fund to the D.C. Federal Pension Fund.

(b)

Transfer of assets. —

Effective October 1, 2004, all assets of the Trust Fund and all assets of the Federal Supplemental Fund as of such date shall be transferred to the D.C. Federal Pension Fund.

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 729, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11083
as added Dec. 23, 2004, 118 Stat. 3967, Pub. L. 108-489, § 2(a)(3)
This section is referenced in § 1-807.06, § 1-811.06, and § 1-817.01.
Former § 1-817.03 has been recodified to § 1-819.03.